New York, session 2025-2026, A4791.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1662-a of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended 2 by chapter 496 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 1662-a. Speed limits in certain towns. The town board of any subur- 4 ban town governed pursuant to article three-A of the town law and the 5 town board of any other town having a population exceeding fifty thou- 6 sand, with respect to highways (which term for the purposes of this 7 section shall include private roads open to public motor vehicle traf- 8 fic) in such towns outside any village, other than state highways main- 9 tained by the state on which the department of transportation shall have 10 established higher or lower speed limits than the statutory fifty-five 11 miles per hour speed limit as provided in section sixteen hundred twenty 12 of this title, or on which the department of transportation shall have 13 designated that such towns shall not establish any maximum speed limit 14 as provided in section sixteen hundred twenty-four of this title, 15 subject to the limitations imposed by section sixteen hundred eighty- 16 four of this title may by local law, ordinance, order, rule or regu- 17 lation establish maximum speed limits at which vehicles may proceed 18 within such towns, within designated areas of such towns or on or along 19 designated highways within such towns lower than the fifty-five miles 20 per hour maximum statutory limit. No such speed limit applicable 21 throughout such towns or within designated areas of such towns shall be 22 established at less than twenty-five miles per hour, except that in the 23 town of Hempstead speed limits may be established at not less than EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04773-01-5 A. 4791 2 1 fifteen miles per hour on any portion of a highway in the community 2 known as Point Lookout and on all or any portion of the following high- 3 ways in the community known as Lido Beach: Ocean Boulevard, Allevard 4 Street, Bath Street, Buxton Street, Cheltenham Street, Pinehurst Street, 5 Harrogate Street, Matlock Street, Nantwick Street, Biarritz Street, 6 Royat Street, Luchon Street, Woodhail Street, Leamington Street, Sarato- 7 ga Street, Kensington Street, Blackheath Road, Lagoon Drive East, and 8 Prescott Street; provided, however, that no such speed limit in such 9 town may be established unless a majority of the residents of each such 10 community file a petition with the town board of such town requesting 11 such speed limit. No such speed limit applicable on or along designated 12 highways within such towns shall be established at less than twenty-five 13 miles per hour, except that school speed limits may be established at 14 not less than fifteen miles per hour, for a distance not to exceed one 15 thousand three hundred twenty feet, on a highway passing a school build- 16 ing, entrance or exit of a school abutting on the highway, and except 17 further that in the town of Hempstead speed limits may be established at 18 not less than fifteen miles per hour on any portion of a highway in the 19 communities known as Point Lookout and Lido Beach; provided, however, 20 that no such speed limit in such town may be established unless a major- 21 ity of the residents of each such community file a petition with the 22 town board of such town requesting such speed limit. No speed limits 23 shall be established pursuant to the provisions of this section except 24 in accordance with the engineering considerations and factors for speed 25 limits set forth in the manual and specifications for a uniform system 26 of traffic control devices maintained by the commissioner of transporta- 27 tion pursuant to section sixteen hundred eighty of this title, as such 28 manual and specifications may be amended from time to time, certified by 29 a licensed professional engineer who specializes in traffic operations. 30 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.